src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! Pronouns
! ========


!Pointing to all the pronominal subgrops
LEXICON Pronoun
 Personal ;
 Demonstrative ;
 Reflexive ;
 Reciprocal ;
 Interrogative ;
 Relative ;
 Indefinite ;


! Personal pronouns
! -----------------

LEXICON Personal
mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1:m persproncasesg ;
mån+Pron+Pers+Du1:m persproncasedu ;
mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1:m persproncasepl ;
dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2:d persproncasesgII ;
dån+Pron+Pers+Du2:d persproncasedu ;
dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2:d persproncasepl ;
sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3:s persproncasesgII ;
sån+Pron+Pers+Du3:s persproncasedu ;
sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3:s persproncasepl ;
!dat+Pron+Pers:da%> datcas ;


! Demonstrative pronouns
! ----------------------

LEXICON Demonstrative
 dat+Pron+Dem:da%>     demcas ;
 dát+Pron+Dem:dá%>     demcas ; 
duot+Pron+Dem:duo%>    demcas ;
 dåt+Pron+Dem:då%>     demcas ;
 dat+Err/Orth+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ela:dejs # ;

! attr form is not conjugated:
dát+Pron+Dem:dá%>     dáhtakcas   ;
dat+Pron+Dem:da%>     dáhtakcas   ;

dakkár+Pron+Dem:dakkár%> dakkárcase ;
dahkkár+Pron+Dem:dahkkár%> dakkárcase ;
dahkár+Pron+Dem:dahkár%> dakkárcase ;

dakkir+Pron+Dem:dakkir%> dakkárcase ;
dahkkir+Pron+Dem:dahkkir%> dakkárcase ;
dahkir+Pron+Dem:dahkir%> dakkárcase ;

dákkár+Pron+Dem:dákkár%> dakkárcase ;
dáhkkár+Pron+Dem:dáhkkár%> dakkárcase ;
dáhkár+Pron+Dem:dáhkár%> dakkárcase ;

dákkir+Pron+Dem:dákkir%> dakkárcase ;
dáhkkir+Pron+Dem:dáhkkir%> dakkárcase ;
dáhkir+Pron+Dem:dáhkir%> dakkárcase ;

duokkár+Pron+Dem:duokkár%> dakkárcase ;
duohkkár+Pron+Dem:duohkkár%> dakkárcase ;
duohkár+Pron+Dem:duohkár%> dakkárcase ;

duokkir+Pron+Dem:duokkir%> dakkárcase ;
duohkkir+Pron+Dem:duohkkir%> dakkárcase ;
duohkir+Pron+Dem:duohkir%> dakkárcase ;

diekkár+Pron+Dem:diekkár%> dakkárcase ;
diehkkár+Pron+Dem:diehkkár%> dakkárcase ;
diehkár+Pron+Dem:diehkár%> dakkárcase ;

diekkir+Pron+Dem:diekkir%> dakkárcase ;
diehkkir+Pron+Dem:diehkkir%> dakkárcase ;
diehkir+Pron+Dem:diehkir%> dakkárcase ;

dåkkár+Pron+Dem:dåkkár%> dakkárcase ;
dåhkkár+Pron+Dem:dåhkkár%> dakkárcase ;
dåhkár+Pron+Dem:dåhkár%> dakkárcase ;

dåkkir+Pron+Dem:dåkkir%> dakkárcase ;
dåhkkir+Pron+Dem:dåhkkir%> dakkárcase ;
dåhkir+Pron+Dem:dåhkir%> dakkárcase ;

dakkárasj+Pron+Dem:dakkára juohkkahasjcase ;
dakkirasj+Pron+Dem:dakkira juohkkahasjcase ;
dákkárasj+Pron+Dem:dákkára juohkkahasjcase ;
dákkirasj+Pron+Dem:dákkira juohkkahasjcase ;
dåkkárasj+Pron+Dem:dåkkára juohkkahasjcase ;
dåkkirasj+Pron+Dem:dåkkira juohkkahasjcase ;
duokkárasj+Pron+Dem:duokkára juohkkahasjcase ;
duokkirasj+Pron+Dem:duokkira juohkkahasjcase ;

!dála+Pron+Dem:dála%> K ; !These are adverbs
!dále+Pron+Dem:dále%> K ; 
!dáli+Pron+Dem:dáli%> K ;
!duola+Pron+Dem:duola%> K ;
!dåvla+Pron+Dem:dåvla%> K ;

! Reflexive pronouns
! ------------------

LEXICON Reflexive
!Two nominative reflexives, and pointer to the rest
iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom:iesj%> K-CONS ;
iesj+Pron+Refl+Du+Nom:ietja%> K-VOW ;
iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Nom:ietja%> K-VOW ;
iesj+Pron+Refl+Ess+Err/Orth:iehtja%>n K-CONS ; !
iesj+Pron+Refl: reflobl;
iesj+Err/Orth+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxPl3:ietjasij K-CONS ; ! lot of typos like that " Ienemusát la æjgádij vihke gå e	ietjasij	mánájda sámásta nav vaj gielav bisodi"
iesj+Err/Orth+Pron+Refl+Sg+Acc+PxSg3:ietjasav K-CONS ; 
iesj+Err/Orth+Pron+Refl+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:ietjamij K-CONS ; !
 
! Reciprocal pronouns 
! -------------------

LEXICON Reciprocal 
!   gaska+Pron+Recipr:gaska%>   PxCiPlstem ;
! gaskajt+Pron+Recipr:gaska%>jd PxCPlstem ;
!  gaskan+Pron+Recipr:gaska%>n  PxCPlstem ;
  
nubbe+Pron+Recipr+Ess:nubbe%>n K-CONS ;
nubbe+Pron+Recipr+Par:nuppe%>t # ;
nubbe+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ill:nubbá%>j K-CONS ;
nubbe+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Nom:nubbe%> K-VOW ;
nubbe+Pron+Recipr+Attr:nubbe%> K-VOW ;
nubbe+Pron+Recipr:nupp nubbecase ;

!! Reciprocal pronouns as multiword expression

nubbe% nubbe+Pron+Recipr: NUBBENUBBELEX ;
goabbák% guojmme+Pron+Recipr: GOABBÁKGUOJMMELEX ;
guhtik% guojmme+Pron+Recipr: GUHTIKGUOJMMELEX ;

! Interrogative and relative pronouns
! -----------------------------------

LEXICON Interrogative
galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill:gallá%>j K-CONS ;
galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:galla%> K-VOW ;
galla+Pron+Interr+Attr:galla%> K-VOW ;
galla+Pron+Interr:gall nubbecase ;

goabbá+Pron+Interr:goabbá goabbácase ;

mij+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:mahá K-VOW ;
!mij+Pron+Interr+Pl:m idiosyncmij ;
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:majdes # ; ! 
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:majdis # ; ! 
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:mejdes # ; ! 
!mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:majt K-CONS ;
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela:massta%> K-VOW ;  
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine:manºna%> K-VOW ;
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:midja%> K-VOW ; !Alt. form ! 
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:midjas%> K-CONS ; !Alt. form ! 
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:mij%> K-CONS ;
!mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Par:mat # ; redundant
mij+Pron+Interr:m%> oblintercas ;

! attr form is not conjugated:
galles+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:gallás%> oblsoamescase ; ! 
galles+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:galles%> K-CONS ;

galli+Pron+Interr:galli%> gallicase ;

guhti+Pron+Interr:ge%> oblintercas_guhti ;
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:guhti%> K-VOW ;
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:gut%> K-CONS ; ! 
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:guhtis%> K-CONS ; ! 
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine:gænºna%> K-s-VOW ;
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+Use/NG:gænºne%> K-s-VOW; ! 
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:gæsste%> K-s-VOW;
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela:gæssta%> K-s-VOW; ! 
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Par:gudi%>t K-s-VOW;
guhti+Err/Orth+Pron+Interr+Sg+Par:guti%>t K-CONS ;
guhti+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom:gudi%> K-VOW ; 
guhti+Pron+Interr+Ess:guhti%>n K-s-VOW;

guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Attr:guhtimusj%> K-CONS ;
guhtimusj+Err/Orth+Pron+Interr+Attr:guhtimus%> K-CONS ;
guhtimusj+Pron+Interr:guhtimu ienebusjcase ;

makkir+Pron+Interr:makkir%> dakkárcase ; 
makkár+Pron+Interr:makkár%> dakkárcase ;

LEXICON Relative
goabbá+Pron+Rel:goabbá goabbácase ;
goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg:goabbá foc-k ;

mij+Pron+Rel:m%>            oblintercas ;
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom:mij%>    K-CONS ;
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:midja%>  K-VOW ; !betont
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:midjas%> K-CONS ; !Alt. form ! 
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela:massta%> K-VOW ; 
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine:manºna%> K-VOW ;
!mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Par:ma%>t    # ; !redundant
mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:ma%>há   K-VOW ; 
!mij+Pron+Rel+Pl:m            idiosyncmij ;

! attr form is not conjugated:
guhti+Pron+Rel:ge%> oblintercas_guhti ;
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom:guhti%> K-VOW ;
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:gut%> K-CONS ; ! 
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:guhtis%> K-CONS ; ! 
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine:gænºna%> K-s-VOW;
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine+Use/NG:gænºne%> K-s-VOW; ! 
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela:gæssta%> K-s-VOW; 
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:gæsste%> K-s-VOW; !dial
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Par:gudi%>t K-s-VOW;
guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom:gudi%> K-VOW ; ! 
guhti+Pron+Rel+Ess:guhtin%> K-CONS ;

guhtimusj+Pron+Rel+Attr:guhtimusj%> K-CONS ;
guhtimusj+Pron+Rel:guhtimu ienebusjcase ;

makkir+Pron+Rel:makkir%> dakkárcase ;
makkár+Pron+Rel:makkár%> dakkárcase ;

! Indefinite pronouns
! -------------------
